Washington statutes.
RCW 43.220.260

Removal of noxious weeds—Planting of plants to provide forage for pollinators.

Any corps project that involves the removal of noxious weeds must, when deemed appropriate for the project goals by the project sponsor, include the planting of pollen-rich and nectar-rich native plants to provide forage for all pollinators, including honey bees.

[ 2016 c 44 s 3.]

NOTES: